Maryland, session 2026, HB1058.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (1) Except as otherwise specifically provided by law or by regulation of the
Treasurer, the Treasurer shall credit to the General Fund any interest on or other income
from State money that the Treasurer invests.
(2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND
214. THE YOUTH DELINQUENCY PREVENTION FUND.
Article – State Government
9–3603.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE YOUTH DELINQUENCY
PREVENTION FUND.
(B) THERE IS A YOUTH DELINQUENCY PREVENTION FUND IN THE OFFICE.

HOUSE BILL 1058 3
(C) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO
COMMUNITY–BASED PROGRAMS, INCLUDING YOUTH SERVICE BUREAUS, THAT
PROVIDE SERVICES TO:
(1) PROVIDE COMMUNITY–ORIENTED DELINQUENCY PREVENTION,
YOUTH SUICIDE PREVENTION, DRUG AND ALCOHOL USE PREVENTION, AND YOUTH
DEVELOPMENT;
(2) AMELIORATE CONDITIONS THAT CONTRIBUTE TO DELINQUENCY,
YOUTH SUICIDE, SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER, AND FAMILY DISRUPTION; AND
(3) ADVOCATE FOR YOUTH NEEDS.
(D) THE OFFICE SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(E) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO REVERSION UNDER § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY, AND THE
COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(F) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(2) INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND; AND
(3) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(G) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR CARRYING OUT THE PURPOSE OF
THE FUND.
(H) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(I) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.

HOUSE BILL 1058
(J) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND FOR CARRYING OUT THE PURPOSE
OF THE FUND IS SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND IS NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF
FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE WOULD BE APPROPRIATED FOR CARRYING OUT THE
PURPOSE OF THE FUND.
(K) NO PART OF THE FUND MAY REVERT OR BE CREDITED TO:
(1) THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE; OR
(2) ANY OTHER SPECIAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(L) THE FUND IS SUBJECT TO AUDIT BY THE OFFICE OF LEGISLATIVE
AUDITS ACCORDING TO § 2–1220 OF THIS ARTICLE.
9–3604.
ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2027, AND EVERY DECEMBER 1 THEREAFTER,
THE OFFICE SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE LEGISLATIVE POLICY COMMITTEE,
THE SENATE BUDGET AND TAXATION COMMITTEE, AND THE HOUSE
APPROPRIATIONS COMMITTEE, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THIS ARTICLE,
THAT INCLUDES FOR THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR:
(1) THE AMOUNT OF FUNDS TRANSFERRED AND DISTRIBUTED FROM
THE YOUTH DELINQUENCY PREVENTION FUND;
(2) THE NUMBER OF GRANTS DISTRIBUTED BY THE YOUTH
DELINQUENCY PREVENTION FUND;
(3) THE AMOUNT OF EACH GRANT DISTRIBUTED BY THE YOUTH
DELINQUENCY PREVENTION FUND;
(4) THE NUMBER OF CHILDREN AND FAMILIES SERVED USING THE
GRANTS DISTRIBUTED FROM THE YOUTH DELINQUENCY PREVENTION FUND,
DISAGGREGATED BY:
(I) AGE OF THE CHILD;
(II) GEOGRAPHIC REGION;
(III) RACE; AND
(IV) ETHNICITY;

HOUSE BILL 1058 5
(5) IF A CHILD SERVED USING THE GRANTS DISTRIBUTED FROM THE
YOUTH DELINQUENCY PREVENTION FUND HAS INTERACTED WITH THE CRIMINAL
JUSTICE SYSTEM OR THE JUVENILE JUSTICE SYSTEM AFTER RECEIVING THE GRANT;
(6) THE AMOUNT OF ANY UNSPENT MONEY IN THE YOUTH
DELINQUENCY PREVENTION FUND; AND
(7) THE REASONS WHY THE FUNDS UNDER ITEM (5) OF THIS SECTION,
IF ANY, WERE NOT SPENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.